Washington statutes.
RCW 26.16.160

Civil disabilities of wife abolished.

All laws which impose or recognize civil disabilities upon a wife, which are not imposed or recognized as existing as to the husband, are hereby abolished, and for any unjust usurpation of her natural or property rights, she shall have the same right to appeal in her own individual name, to the courts of law or equity for redress and protection that the husband has: PROVIDED, ALWAYS, That nothing in *this chapter shall be construed to confer upon the wife any right to vote or hold office, except as otherwise provided by law.

[Code 1881 s 2398; 1879 p 151 s 1; RRS s 6901.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "this chapter," see note following RCW 26.16.120.